Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2563YH (5) 91 je/js H.F. 681 Section 1. Section 10A.106, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The department is comprised of the administrative 3 hearings division, labor services division, wage and hour 4 division, workersâ compensation division, and other divisions 5 as appropriate. 6 Sec. 2. Section 10A.202, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 2. The department is responsible for the administration of 9 the laws of this state under chapters 88A , 88B , 89 , 89A , 90A , 10 91A , 91C , 91D , 91E , 92 , and such other labor-services duties 11 assigned to the department or director. 12 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 10A.1000 Definition. 13 As used in this subchapter, âdivisionâ means the wage and 14 hour division of the department of inspections, appeals, and 15 licensing. 16 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 10A.1001 Wage and hour division ââ 17 responsibilities. 18 1. The division is responsible for the administration of 19 the laws of this state under chapters 91A, 91D, and 92, and 20 such other duties assigned to the division or director. The 21 executive head of the division is the director. 22 2. The division shall investigate reported violations of 23 the laws it administers and engage in statutorily authorized 24 enforcement activities against violators of such laws, 25 including pursuing statutorily authorized penalties and 26 remedies. The division shall prioritize such investigation 27 and enforcement over referral of complaints to the federal 28 department of labor or reliance on the federal department of 29 labor to enforce federal laws governing similar subjects. 30